Utah statutes.
7-1-709.   Branches -- Discontinuance of operation.
(1)  A Utah depository institution or out-of-state depository institution
authorized to do business in this state may discontinue operation of a branch
upon resolution of its board of directors.
(2)  Upon adopting the resolution, the institution shall file an application
with the commissioner specifying:
(a)  the location of the branch to be discontinued;
(b)  the date of the proposed discontinuance;
(c)  the reasons for closing the branch; and
(d)  the extent to which the public need and convenience or service to members
would still be adequately met.
(3) (a)  Upon filing its application with the commissioner, the institution
shall publish notice of the discontinuance:
(i)  in a newspaper serving the area once a week for two consecutive weeks;
and
(ii)  as required by Section 45-1-101 for two weeks.
(b)  The commissioner may approve the application after a reasonable comment
period following publication.
(4)  An out-of-state depository institution with a branch in Utah is not
subject to the requirements of this section if the branch to be closed is
located outside of Utah.
